New York, session 2025-2026, A9289.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 9.46 of the mental hygiene law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision (e) to read as follows: 3 (e) The provisions of subdivision (b) of this section shall not apply 4 where the person receiving treatment services is a current sworn police 5 officer or peace officer as such terms are defined in section 1.20 of 6 the criminal procedure law, unless the mental health professional deter- 7 mines, based on reasonable professional judgment, that the condition 8 impairs such person's ability to perform their job duties. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13924-01-5